Delaware, session 153, HB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 106, Title 26 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 106. Office; seal; rules; meetings. (a) The Commission shall have such office or offices as may be necessary and shall be provided with all necessary furniture, stationery and supplies, and office appliances. It shall provide itself with a seal for the authentication of its proceedings and orders. It may make all needful rules for its government and other proceedings not inconsistent with this title. It shall meet at such times and places within this State as it may provide by rule or by special order. (b) Meetings of the Commission must be available over the internet by livestream broadcast that meets all of the following: (1) Streams audio and video of the meeting. (2) Permits the public to hear all participants contemporaneously. (c) Meetings of the Commission must allow for virtual public comment.